Hawaii statutes.
§132D-5 General prohibitions. (a) It
shall be unlawful for any person without a permit issued under section 132D-10
by a county fire department to:

(1) Remove or extract the pyrotechnic contents from
any fireworks;

(2) Throw any ignited fireworks:

(A) From, at, or into a vehicle;

(B) At a person or an animal; and

(C) From above the first floor of any
building; or

(3) Set off, ignite, discharge, or otherwise cause to
explode any fireworks:

(A) Above the first floor of any building;

(B) In any vehicle;

(C) At any time not within the periods for use
prescribed in section 132D-3;

(D) Within one thousand feet of any operating
hospital, licensed convalescent home, licensed home for the elderly, zoo,
licensed animal shelter, or licensed animal hospital;

(E) In any school building, or on any school
grounds and yards without first obtaining authorization from appropriate school
officials;

(F) On any highway, alley, street, sidewalk,
or other public way; in any park; on any public beach; in any officially
designated forest or wildlife preserve; within fifty feet of a canefield; or
within one thousand feet of any building used for public worship during the
periods when services are held; and

(G) Within five hundred feet of any hotel.

(b) It shall be unlawful to purchase consumer
fireworks more than five calendar days before the time periods for permissible
use under section 132D-3.

(c) It shall be unlawful to sell consumer
fireworks after 12:01 a.m. on New Year's Day, 6:00 p.m. on Chinese New Year's
Day, and 8:00 p.m. on the Fourth of July. [L 1994, c 180, pt of §1; am L 2006,
c 183, §6; am L 2008, c 38, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next